Washington statutes.
RCW 6.13.160

Sale, if not divisible.

If, from the report, it appears to the court that the appraised value of the homestead property, less liens and encumbrances senior to the judgment being executed upon and not including the judgment being executed upon, exceeds the amount of the homestead exemption and the property is not divided, the court must make an order directing its sale under the execution. The order shall direct that at such sale no bid may be received unless it exceeds the amount of the homestead exemption.

[ 1999 c 403 s 3; 1987 c 442 s 216; 1981 c 329 s 18; 1895 c 64 s 18; RRS s 546. Formerly RCW 6.12.230.]

NOTES:

Severability—1981 c 329: See note following RCW 6.21.020.